Utah statutes.
79-5-401.   Cooperative agreements.

The division may enter into cooperative agreements with federal, state, or local governmental entities, private landowners, or private corporations that specify the responsibilities of each entity for the development, operation, and maintenance of trails, including law enforcement along trails.

